Hawaii statutes.
§11-14 General county register;
restrictions in use. (a) The clerk of each county shall register all the
voters in the clerk's county in the general county register. The register
shall contain the name and address of each voter unless the voter's address is
deemed confidential pursuant to section 11‑14.5. Additional information
required by section 11-15 may be included in the register at the discretion of
the clerk. The general county register shall be available for election or
government purposes only in accordance with section 11-97.

(b) The affidavits filed under section 11-15
and the general county register may be copied, and the clerk may release voter
lists or data; provided that information furnished in the affidavits shall be
copied or released for election or government purposes only in accordance with
section 11-97.

(c) Voter registration information that is
collected and maintained by the clerk of each county may be transmitted to a
central file for the purpose of correlating registration data to prevent or
detect duplicate voter registrations and for the compilation of election
reports.

(d) Unless authorized under section 11-97, it
shall be unlawful for any person to use, print, publish, or distribute any
voter registration information acquired directly or indirectly from the voter
registration affidavits or any list prepared therefrom. Any person who is
designated by the clerk to register voters and collect voter registration
affidavits shall be advised of the provisions of this subsection. Any person
who violates this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. [L 1970, c 26,
pt of §2; am L 1973, c 217, §1(e); am L 1976, c 106, §1(3); am L 1977, c 189,
§1(2); am L 1979, c 139, §2; am L 1982, c 226, §2; gen ch 1985; am L 1990, c
156, §5; am L 1998, c 23, §1; am L 2005, c 201, §2; am L 2012, c 225, §2]

Cross References

Government records, see chapter 92F.

Records open to inspection, see §11-97.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next